Nevada, session 83, SB305.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 385B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 3, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association
shall adopt regulations that set forth the process for the
Association to designate a sanctioned sport. The regulations
adopted pursuant to this section must include, without limitation,
provisions:
(a) That establish the process for:
(1) Determining the rules governing the eligibility and
participation of pupils in a sanctioned sport;
(2) Prescribing the rules used in competition;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(3) Establishing the length of a season of a sanctioned
sport and the date upon which a school may begin practicing for a
season of a sanctioned sport;
(4) Establishing guidelines for the safety of pupils that
comply with any regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 385B.080;
and
(5) Prescribing any other guidelines necessary to govern
participation in a sanctioned sport;
(b) That authorize any person or entity to submit a request for
the Association to designate a sanctioned sport and require the
Association to approve or deny such a request not later than 1 year
after the Association receives the request; and
(c) That prioritize the designation of club sports that have been
established at schools as a sanctioned sport.
2. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association shall
publish any regulations adopted pursuant to this section on the
Internet website maintained by the Association.
3. If the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association does
not adopt the regulations required by this section on or before
October 1, 2025, or does not approve or deny a request received
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 and adopt any necessary
regulations within 1 year after receipt of such a request:
(a) The authority, power and duty to approve or deny a request
received pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 and adopt any
rules or regulations required by this section that have not been
adopted by the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association
transfers to the Nevada Association of School Superintendents;
and
(b) Any rules or regulations adopted by the Nevada
Association of School Superintendents pursuant to paragraph (a)
shall be effective until such time as the Nevada Interscholastic
Activities Association amends such rules or regulations. The
provisions of chapter 233B of NRS governing the adoption of
regulations apply to any regulations adopted by the Nevada
Association of School Superintendents pursuant to this subsection.
4. A school is not required to establish athletic programs, host
athletic competitions or other interscholastic activities or events or
otherwise support the formation of any teams, clubs or
organizations for any sport that is sanctioned pursuant to any
regulations adopted pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2.1. As used in sections 2.1 to 2.7, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, “Subcommittee” means the
Subcommittee on Interscholastic Activities of the Joint Interim
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Standing Committee on Education established by section 2.3 of
this act.
Sec. 2.3. 1. There is hereby established the Subcommittee
on Interscholastic Activities of the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education, consisting of members appointed by the
Chair of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, who
must include:
(a) Two members of the Senate who are members of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education;
(b) Two members of the Assembly who are members of the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education;
(c) One member who is an elected member of the board of
trustees of a school district, appointed with appropriate regard for
his or her experience with and knowledge of matters relating to
interscholastic activities;
(d) One member who is the superintendent of schools of a
school district, who is recommended by the Nevada Association of
School Superintendents or its successor organization; and
(e) One member who is the parent or legal guardian of a pupil
who participates in interscholastic activities or events in this State.
2. The members who are Legislators must be appointed to
provide representation from the various geographical regions of
the State.
3. The Chair of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education shall appoint a Chair of the Subcommittee from one
House and a Vice Chair of the Subcommittee from the other
House. Each Chair and Vice Chair holds office for a term of 2
years commencing on July 1 of each odd-numbered year. If a
vacancy occurs in the office of Chair or Vice Chair, the vacancy
must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
4. Any member of the Subcommittee described in paragraph
(a), (b) or (c) of subsection 1 who is not a candidate for reelection
or who is defeated for reelection continues to serve after the
general election until the next regular or special session convenes.
5. Vacancies on the Subcommittee must be filled in the same
manner as original appointments.
6. The Chair of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education may appoint alternates for members of the
Subcommittee. The Chair of the Subcommittee:
(a) May designate an alternate appointed by the Chair of the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education to serve in place
of a regular member who is unable to attend a meeting; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(b) Shall, for a member who is a Legislator, designate an
alternate appointed by the Chair of the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education who is a member of the same House and
political party as the regular member to serve in place of the
regular member if one is available.
Sec. 2.5. 1. Except as otherwise ordered by the Legislative
Commission, the members of the Subcommittee shall meet not
earlier than November 1 of each odd-numbered year and not later
than August 31 of the following even-numbered year at the times
and places specified by a call of the Chair of the Subcommittee or
a majority of the Subcommittee.
2. The Research Director of the Research Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, or his or her designee, shall act as
the nonvoting recording Secretary for the Subcommittee.
3. The Subcommittee shall prescribe rules for its own
management and government.
4. A majority of the members of the Subcommittee constitutes
a quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the power and authority
conferred on the Subcommittee.
5. Except during a regular or special session, for each day or
portion of a day during which members of the Subcommittee who
are Legislators attend a meeting of the Subcommittee or are
otherwise engaged in the business of the Subcommittee, the
members are entitled to receive:
(a) The compensation provided for a majority of the
Legislators during the first 60 days of the preceding regular
session;
(b) The per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally; and
(c) The travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
6. All such compensation, per diem allowances and travel
expenses of the members of the Subcommittee who are Legislators
must be paid from the Legislative Fund.
7. Each member of the Subcommittee appointed pursuant to
paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection 1 of section 2.3 of this act is
entitled to receive the subsistence allowances and travel expenses
provided by law for his or her position for each day of attendance
at a meeting of the Subcommittee and while engaged in the
business of the Subcommittee, to be paid by the appropriate school
district.
Sec. 2.7. The Subcommittee may:
1. Review and comment on any action, activity or
administrative policy, rule or regulation of the Nevada
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Interscholastic Activities Association established pursuant to
NRS 385B.050;
2. Conduct investigations and hold hearings in connection
with its review, including, without limitation, investigating the
effect on the State, its citizens and political subdivisions of those
policies, rules, regulations and related laws, and exercise any of
the investigative powers set forth in NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140,
inclusive;
3. Review interscholastic activities and events and
competitions in this State to ensure compliance with Title IX of the
Education Amendments Act of 1972, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1681 et seq.;
4. Consult with and advise the Department, the State Public
Charter School Authority, the Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association and any school district on matters concerning
interscholastic activities and events;
5. Direct the Legislative Counsel Bureau to assist the
Subcommittee in its research, investigations, review and comment;
6. Submit any recommendations for legislation to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Legislature;
7. Advise the Attorney General if the Subcommittee believes
that any policy, rule or regulation which it has reviewed
encroaches on the sovereignty respecting the ability of the State to
govern interscholastic activities and events;
8. Apply for any available grants and accept any gifts, grants
or donations to assist the Subcommittee in carrying out its duties;
and
9. Review and comment on any other matter relating to
interscholastic activities and events deemed appropriate by the
Chair of the Subcommittee or by a majority of the members of the
Subcommittee.
Secs. 3 and 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association shall
adopt the regulations required by subsection 1 of section 2 of this
act not later than October 1, 2025.
Sec. 5.3. 1. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association shall adopt:
(a) Regulations designating lacrosse as a sanctioned sport for
boys and as a sanctioned sport for girls beginning with the 2026-
2027 school year; and
(b) All rules and regulations necessary for pupils to participate
in lacrosse as a sanctioned sport for boys and as a sanctioned sport
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
for girls beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, including,
without limitation, any rules and regulations necessary to:
(1) Determine the eligibility and participation of pupils in
lacrosse as a sanctioned sport;
(2) Prescribe the rules used in competition;
(3) Establish the length of a season and the date upon which
a school may begin practicing for a season;
(4) Establish guidelines for the safety of pupils that comply
with any regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 385B.080; and
(5) Prescribe any other guidelines necessary to govern
participation in lacrosse as a sanctioned sport.
2. Not later than the 20 business days after the end of each
calendar quarter ending before January 1, 2027, the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association shall submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education a report on the progress of the
Association in the implementation of lacrosse as a sanctioned sport
for boys and as a sanctioned sport for girls, including, without
limitation, a summary of the actions taken by the Association during
the calendar quarter with regard to the implementation of lacrosse as
a sanctioned sport.
3. If the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association does not
adopt the regulations required by this section on or before May 1,
2026:
(a) The authority, power and duty to adopt any rules or
regulations required by this section that have not been adopted by
the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association transfers to the
Nevada Association of School Superintendents; and
(b) Any rules or regulations adopted by the Nevada Association
of School Superintendents pursuant to paragraph (a) shall be
effective until such time as the Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association amends such rules or regulations. The provisions of
chapter 233B of NRS governing the adoption of regulations apply to
any regulations adopted by the Nevada Association of School
Superintendents pursuant to this subsection.
(c) The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association shall
transfer to the Nevada Association of School Superintendents a
payment in the amount of $25,000 for the purpose of defraying any
costs associated with adopting any regulations pursuant to this
subsection.
Sec. 5.7. 1. During the 2025-2026 interim, the
Subcommittee on Interscholastic Activities of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education shall conduct an interim study
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
concerning the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association. The
study must include, without limitation, a comprehensive evaluation
of the finances, governing structure, processes, duties and powers of
the Association.
2. The Subcommittee shall include its finding and
recommendations for legislation relating to the study in the report
required by subsection 4 of NRS 218E.330 to be prepared and
submitted to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 84th Session of the Legislature.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.5. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)